Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 8. Trespass.

Collateral references. —

75 Am. Jur. 2d, Trespass, § 1 et seq.

87 C.J.S., Trespass to Try Title, § 1 et seq.

Credit for expenditures in producing, as against liability for value of, oil or minerals, 21 ALR2d 380.

Right to enter land to remove timber cut before revocation of license, 26 ALR2d 1194.

Jurisdiction of action at law for damages for tort concerning real property in another state or county, 30 ALR2d 1219.

Life tenant’s right of action for injury or damage to property, 49 ALR2d 1117.

Injunction against repeated or continuing trespasses on real property, 60 ALR2d 310.

Liability for property damage caused by vibrations, or the like, without blasting or explosion, 79 ALR2d 966.

Statutes of limitation concerning actions of trespass as applicable to actions for injury to property not constituting a common-law trespass, 15 ALR3d 1228.

Award of or pending proceedings for compensation for property condemned as precluding action for damages arising from prior trespasses upon it, 33 ALR3d 1132.

Liability for overflow of water confined or diverted for public water power purposes, 91 A.L.R.3d 1065.

Recovery in trespass for injury to land caused by airborne pollutants, 2 ALR4th 1054.

Modern status of rules conditioning landowner’s liability upon status of injured party as invitee, licensee, or trespasser, 22 ALR4th 294.

Sec. 09.45.730.
Trespass by cutting or injuring trees or shrubs.

A person who without lawful authority cuts down, girdles, or otherwise injures or removes a tree, timber, or a shrub on (1) the land of another person or on the street or highway in front of a person’s house, or (2) a village or municipal lot, or cultivated grounds, or the commons or public land of a village or municipality, or (3) the street or highway in front of land described in (2) of this section, is liable to the owner of that land, or to the village or municipality for treble the amount of damages that may be assessed in a civil action. However, if the trespass was unintentional or involuntary, or the defendant had probable cause to believe that the land on which the trespass was committed was the defendant’s own or that of the person in whose service or by whose direction the act was done, or where the timber was taken from unenclosed woodland for the purpose of repairing a public highway or bridge on or adjoining the land, only actual damages may be recovered.

History.

(§ 27.01 ch 101 SLA 1962; am § 16 ch 85 SLA 1988)

Legislative history reports. —

For an analysis of the amendment of this section by sec. 16, ch. 85, SLA 1988 (HCS CSSB 413 (Jud)), see 1988 House & Senate Joint Journal Supplement No. 18, May 10, 1988, p. 4.

Sec. 09.45.735.
Trespass related to geotechnical surveys and mining.

A person who trespasses upon the land of another to gather geotechnical data or take mineral resources is liable to the owner of the land for treble the amount of damages that may be assessed in a civil action. If the trespass is unintentional or involuntary or the defendant had probable cause to believe that the land on which the trespass was committed was the defendant’s own or that of the person in whose service or by whose direction the act was done, only actual damages may be recovered.

History.

(§ 1 ch 168 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.45.730(b).
Renumbered in 1988.